Washington statutes.
RCW 35.53.020

Discharge of trust.

The city or town may relieve itself of its trust relation to a local improvement district fund or revenue bond fund into which utility local improvement assessments are pledged to be paid as to any lot, tract, or parcel of property by paying into the fund the amount of the delinquent assessment for which the property was sold and all accrued interest, together with interest to the time of the next call of bonds or warrants against such fund at the rate provided thereon. Upon such payment the city or town shall hold the property discharged of the trust.

[ 1967 c 52 s 21; 1965 c 7 s 35.53.020. Prior: 1933 c 107 s 1, part; 1927 c 275 s 3, part; 1911 c 98 s 31, part; RRS s 9383, part.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.